Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201417-306
City of the second class; reorganization
as village; petition; election.

(1) The registered voters of a city
of the second class may vote to discontinue organization as a city of the second class and organize
as a village. The issue may
be placed before the voters by a resolution adopted by the city council or
by petition signed by one-fourth of the registered voters of such
city.

(2) The petitions shall
conform to section 32-628. The Secretary of State shall design the form to
be used for the petitions. Petition signers and petition circulators shall
conform to the requirements of sections 32-629 and 32-630. The city council
shall submit the petitions to the election commissioner or county clerk for
signature verification pursuant to section 32-631. The required number of
signatures shall be one-fourth of the number of voters registered in the city
at the last statewide general election. The election commissioner or county
clerk shall notify the city council within thirty days after receiving the
petitions from the city council whether the required number of signatures
has been gathered. The city shall reimburse the county for any costs incurred
by the election commissioner or county clerk.

(3) If the city council determines that the petitions are
in proper form and signed by the necessary number of registered voters or
after adoption of the resolution by the city council, the city council shall
submit the question to the voters of whether to discontinue organization as
a city of the second class and organize as a village at a special election
pursuant to section 32-559 or at the same time as a local or statewide primary
or general election held in the city of the second class. The
form of ballot shall be For organization as a village, and Against organization
as a village, and at the same election the voters
shall vote for five trustees for the village. If a majority of the votes cast
are For organization as a village, then such city shall within sixty days
after such election become a village and be governed under the laws of this state applicable to
a village unless at
some future election such
village votes to reorganize as a city of the second class in the manner provided
in section 17-306.01.

Laws 1879, § 53, p. 205;

Laws 1909, c. 21, § 1, p. 189;

R.S.1913, § 5077;

C.S.1922, § 4249;

C.S.1929, § 17-301;

R.S.1943, § 17-306;

Laws 1972, LB 661, § 3;

Laws 2014, LB702, § 3.
April 11, 2014
Whenever a city of second class desires to discontinue its organization and return to a village organization, it may do so. State ex rel. Hostetter v. Holden, 19 Neb. 249, 27 N.W. 120 (1886).